Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-938
Registered voter; early voting; when allowed.

(1) A registered voter shall be permitted to vote early by requesting a ballot for early voting pursuant to section 32-941 or 32-943.

(2) Any person excluded from voting under section 32-313 or 32-314 shall not be allowed to receive a ballot for early voting.

(3) Any person who fails to register to vote by the voter registration deadline shall not be allowed to vote except as provided in section 32-940 or 32-941.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 281;

Laws 1995, LB 514, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 571, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 40.